Arkansas, session 2025, HB1027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Brighter Start Act of
2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 84, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-84-115. Contribution — Treasurer of State.
(a) A contribution in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) shall
be transferred by the Treasurer of State from the General Revenue Fund
Account of the State Apportionment Fund to each:
(1) Existing account established for a designated beneficiary;
and
*TNL032*
01-16-2025 14:57:44 TNL032

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1027
(2) Future account established for a designated beneficiary.
(b) The Treasurer of State shall:
(1) Administer the disbursement of funds under this section; and
(2) Verify the eligibility under this subchapter of each
existing account and future account that receives the contribution under
subsection (a) of this section.

/s/D. Garner




























01-16-2025 14:57:44 TNL032